Utah statutes.
53B-1-101.   Purpose of title.
It is the purpose of this title:
(1)  to provide a high quality, efficient, and economical public system of
higher education through centralized direction and master planning which:
(a)  avoids unnecessary duplication;
(b)  provides for the systematic and orderly development of facilities and
quality programs;
(c)  provides for coordination and consolidation; and
(d)  provides for systematic development of the role or roles of each
institution within the system of higher education consistent with the
historical heritage and tradition of each institution;
(2)  to vest in the State Board of Regents the power to govern the state
system of higher education consistent with state law and delegate certain
powers to institutional boards of trustees and institutional presidents, and
to vest certain powers in institutional boards of trustees and institutional
presidents.
